Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1711XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 482 Section 1. Section 13.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Provide legal representation in contempt 3 of court proceedings to recover criminal restitution ordered in 4 a case in which a public employee, as defined in section 20.3, 5 subsection 9, was killed as a result of criminal action while 6 in the scope of employment. 7